Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6848
Emergency services; health care provider, bill; limitation.

If a covered person receives emergency services at an in-network or out-of-network health care facility, the health care provider performing those services shall not bill the covered person in excess of any deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amount applicable to in-network services pursuant to the covered person's health benefits plan.

Laws 2020, LB997, § 15.